Massachusetts, session 194th, H3945.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (d) of section 29A of chapter 23G of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clause (12) and
inserting in place thereof the following clause:-
(12) preference shall be given to projects located within an environmental justice
municipality or located within 1 mile of an environmental justice municipality, as defined in
section 62 of chapter 30.
SECTION 2. Section 62 of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the definition of “Environmental burdens” the following definition:-
“Environmental justice municipality”, a municipality that meets 1 or more of the
following criteria: (i) the annual median household income is not more than 65 per cent of the
statewide annual median household income; (ii) minorities comprise 40 per cent or more of the
population; (iii) 25 per cent or more of households lack English language proficiency; or (iv)
of 2

minorities comprise 25 per cent or more of the population and the annual median household
income of the municipality in which the neighborhood is located does not exceed 150 per cent of
the statewide annual median household income; provided, that the secretary may determine that a
municipality shall not be designated an environmental justice municipality upon finding that: (A)
the annual median household income of the municipality is greater than 125 per cent of the
statewide median household income; (B) a majority of persons age 25 and older in the
municipality have a college education; (C) the municipality does not bear an unfair burden of
environmental pollution; and (D) the municipality has more than limited access to natural
resources, including open spaces and water resources, playgrounds and other constructed outdoor
recreational facilities and venues.
of 2